test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aeldd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - äldd a-stem : # 'reindeer cow/vaadin' Noun - full paradigm
     äldd+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: äldd
     äldd+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ääld
     äldd+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ääld
     äldd+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: alddu
     äldd+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ääldast
     äldd+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ääldain
     äldd+N+Ess+Indef: älddan
     äldd+N+Par+Indef: älddad
     äldd+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ääldtaa, ääldtää]
     äldd+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ääld
     äldd+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ääldai
     äldd+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ääldaid
     äldd+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ääldaid
     äldd+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ääldain
     äldd+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ääldaivuiʹm
     äldd+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ääldaitaa, ääldaitää]
     äldd+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: aalduž
